Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-207
Correcting filed document.

(MBCA 1.24) (a) A domestic
or foreign corporation may correct a document filed with the Secretary of
State if (1) the document contains an inaccuracy, or (2) the document was
defectively signed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged, or (3) the
electronic transmission was defective.

(b) A document is corrected:

(1) By preparing articles
of correction that:

(i)
Describe the document, including its filing date, or attach a copy of it to
the articles;

(ii)
Specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected; and

(iii) Correct the inaccuracy or defect;
and

(2)
By delivering the articles to the Secretary of State for filing.

(c) Articles of correction
are effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as
to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the
correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when
filed.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 7.
January 1, 2016